Nebraska, session 109, LB643.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB643 LB643
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a)(i) Qualified nonprofit organization means any organization
which:
(A) Is not organized for profit; and
(B) Has as a principal purpose the creation, development, or
preservation of affordable housing.
(ii) Qualified nonprofit organization includes any:
(A) Community development corporation of the United States
Department of Veterans Affairs or the United States Department of Housing
and Urban Development;
(B) Community housing development organization as defined in section
104 of the Cranston-Gonzales National Affordable Housing Act, 42 U.S.C.
12704, as such section existed on January 1, 2025;
(C) Community-based development organization qualified under 24
C.F.R. 570.204, as such regulation existed on January 1, 2025;
(D) Land bank as created under the Nebraska Municipal Land Bank Act;
(E) Resident-owned cooperative;
(F) Subsidiary of a public housing agency as defined in section 3(b)
(6) of the United States Housing Act of 1937, 42 U.S.C. 1437a(b)(6), as
such section existed on January 1, 2025;
(G) Community land trust; and
(H) Project that qualifies under the Affordable Housing Tax Credit
Act; and
(b) Community land trust means a private nonprofit organization that
acquires and holds parcels of land in perpetuity and leases such parcels
for housing, often homeownership, and other community purposes that
benefit low-income and medium-income families and communities.
(2) For taxable years beginning or deemed to begin on or after
January 1, 2026, any person who owns directly or indirectly more than
thirty parcels of single-family residential property as defined in
section 77-3505.04 as investment or rental property shall not claim any
-2-

LB643 LB643
2025 2025
deductions from Nebraska income taxes relating to any interest or taxes
paid on or any maintenance of such property.
(3) This section shall not apply to any:
(a) Property of a person used as the principal residence of such
person;
(b) Property of a qualified nonprofit organization; or
(c) Person who sold at least:
(i) Ten percent of the single-family residential property that was
owned by such person on January 1 of any calendar year and such property
was sold during such year to buyers who will reside at such property; or
(ii) Five percent of the single-family residential property that was
owned by such person on January 1 of any calendar year and such
properties were sold during such year to first-time homebuyers as defined
in section 58-211.01.
(4) A person may appeal to the Department of Revenue that the
single-family residential property of such person was offered for sale at
a fair market rate for at least ninety days and there were no good faith
offers on such property. If such appeal is successful, such person may
claim deductions from Nebraska income taxes relating to any interest or
taxes paid on or any maintenance of such property.
-3-